North Dakota, session 69, SB2077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-04.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-04.1-21. Proceeding following verdict or finding.
After entry of a verdict, finding, or an unresisted plea, that an individual committed the crime
charged, but is not guilty by reason of lack of criminal responsibility, the court shall:
1. Make a finding, based upon the verdict or finding provided in section 12.1-04.1-18, of the
expiration date of the court's jurisdiction; and
2. Order the individual committed to a treatment facility, as defined under chapter 25-03.1, for
examination. The superintendent or the director of a treatment facility may petition the court to
transfer or assign the individual committed if, in the superintendent's or director's opinion, it
would be more appropriate for the individual committed to receive the examination in or by a
least restrictive setting if the attending physician or director of the least restrictive setting
consents. The order of the court may set terms of custody during the period of examination.

S. B. NO. 2077 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2077.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State